Georgia, session 2025_26, HB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general provisions, is amended
in Chapter 4, relating to holidays and observances, by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"1-4-27.
The second Monday in August of each year is designated as 'Local Elected Officials Day'
in Georgia."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 259
- 1 -